Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Subarticle B. Involuntary Dissolution and Liquidation.

§ 81-27-8.101.
When commissioner may take charge.

The commissioner may forthwith take possession of the business and property of any state trust company to which this chapter is applicable whenever it shall appear that such state trust company:

Has violated its charter or any laws applicable thereto;

Is conducting its business in an unauthorized or unsafe manner;

Is in an unsafe or unsound condition to transact its business;

Has an impairment of its capital;

Has become otherwise insolvent;

Has neglected or refused to comply with the terms of a duly issued lawful order of the commissioner;

Has refused, upon proper demand, to submit its records, affairs, and concerns for inspection and examination of a duly appointed or authorized examiner of the commissioner;

Its officers have refused to be examined upon oath regarding its affairs; or

Has made a voluntary assignment of its assets to trustees.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.102.
Directors may act.

Any state trust company may place its assets and business under the control of the commissioner for liquidation by a resolution of a majority of its directors or members upon notice to the commissioner, and, upon taking possession of the state trust company, the commissioner, or duly appointed agent, shall retain possession thereof until such state trust company shall be authorized by the commissioner to resume business or until the affairs of the state trust company shall be fully liquidated as provided in this article. No state trust company shall make any general assignment for the benefit of its creditors except by surrendering possession of its assets to the commissioner, as herein provided. Whenever any state trust company for any reason shall suspend operations for any length of time, the state trust company shall, immediately upon such suspension of operations, be deemed in the possession of the commissioner and subject to liquidation hereunder.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.103.
Notice of seizure; bar to attachment.

When the commissioner, or duly appointed agent, shall take possession of any state trust company under Section 81-27-8.101 or Section 81-27-8.102, the commissioner or agent shall within forty-eight (48) hours, file with the chancery clerk of the county where the state trust company is located, a notice of such action which shall state the reason therefor, and such notice shall be deemed the equivalent of a summons and complaint against the state trust company in an action in the chancery court except that it shall not be necessary to make service thereof. The taking possession of any state trust company shall be effective on the date when such authority was exercised and from and after such time all assets and property of such state trust company, of whatever nature, shall be deemed to be in possession of the commissioner, and the exercise of such authority shall operate as a bar to any attachment, or other legal proceeding against the state trust company or its assets. After the commissioner’s exercise of authority, no lien shall be acquired, in any manner binding or affecting any of the assets of the state trust company and every transfer or assignment made thereafter by the state trust company, or by its authority, of the whole or any part of its assets, shall be null and void; and the commissioner, shall be substituted in place of the state trust company in all actions in the state or federal courts, pending at the time of the exercise of such authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.104.
Notice to trust institutions, corporations and others holding assets; liens not to accrue.

Upon taking possession of the assets and business of any state trust company, the commissioner, or duly appointed agent, shall forthwith give notice, by mail or otherwise, of such action to all trust institutions or other persons or corporations holding, or having in possession, any assets of such state trust company. No trust company or other person or corporation shall have a lien or charge for any payment, advance or clearance made, or liability incurred against any of the assets of the state trust company after possession has been taken as provided under this section, except as hereinafter provided.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.105.
Permission to resume business.

After the commissioner has taken possession of any state trust company, such state trust company may resume business as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.106.
Remedy for seizure; answer to notice, injunction; and appeal.

Whenever any state trust company, of whose assets and business the commissioner has taken possession as herein provided, except where possession is taken under Section 81-27-8.102, shall deem itself aggrieved thereby, and it may, at any time within ten (10) days after the filing of the notice with the chancery clerk, file an answer to the notice and may also upon notice to the commissioner, apply to the presiding chancellor of the district for an injunction to enjoin further proceedings by the commissioner. The chancellor may cite the commissioner to show cause within ten (10) days thereafter why further proceedings should not be enjoined, and after hearing the allegations and proof of the parties with respect to the condition of the state trust company, may dismiss such application for injunction or may enjoin further proceedings under this section by the commissioner. If the chancellor shall enjoin further action of the commissioner and permit the reopening of the state trust company, the chancellor shall have authority to require of such state trust company a surety bond as the chancellor deems necessary to insure its solvency, payable to the commissioner for the sole benefit of the general creditors of the state trust company, and upon such terms as the chancellor may deem proper. Either party shall have the right to appeal to the Supreme Court as in other actions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.107.
Collection of debts and claims; commissioner succeeds to all property of the state trust company.

Upon taking possession of the assets and business of any state trust company by the commissioner, or a duly appointed agent, the commissioner or agent is authorized to collect all money due the state trust company, and to do such other acts as are necessary to conserve its assets and property, and shall proceed to liquidate the affairs thereof, as hereinafter provided. The commissioner, or a duly appointed agent, shall collect all debts due and claims belonging to the state trust company, by suit, if necessary; and, by motion in the pending action, and, upon authority of an order of the presiding chancellor of the district, may sell, compromise or compound any bad or doubtful debt or claim, and may upon such order, sell the real and personal property of the state trust company on such terms as the order may provide or direct, except that where the sale is made under power contained in any mortgage or lien bond or other paper wherein the title is retained for sale and the terms of sale set out, sale may be made under that authority.

Upon taking possession of any state trust company under this section, the commissioner and/or the duly appointed agent, shall have the possession and the right to the possession of all the property, assets, choses in action, rights and privileges of the state trust company, including the right to resign the trust or exercise the power in all papers executed to secure the payment of money in any form in which the state trust company shall have been named as trustee and/or pledgee, and such property right and privileges shall vest in the commissioner and/or duly appointed liquidating agent absolutely, for the purpose of liquidating, and sales and conveyance of the same, together with any and all other incidental rights, privileges, and powers necessary and convenient for the enjoyment of the right of conveyance and sale and for the exercise of the same. Upon the motion made, the state trust company or any person interested, may be heard, but the chancellor hearing the motion shall enter an order as in the chancellor’s discretion will best serve the parties interested.

The officers and directors of any state trust company, or any state trust company that is in liquidation as provided by law, shall not hereafter exercise any powers herein declared to be vested in the commissioner, and/or the duly appointed liquidating agent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.108.
Bond of the commissioner; surety; condition; minimum penalty.

Upon taking possession of any state trust company, the commissioner, or a duly appointed agent shall execute and file a bond payable to this state, with some surety company as surety thereon, with the chancery clerk of the county where the state trust company is located, conditioned upon the faithful performance of all duties imposed by reason of the liquidation of such state trust company by the commissioner, or duly appointed agent assisting in the liquidation of a state trust company, the penal sum of the bond to be fixed by order of the commissioner, which in no case shall be less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00). Any person interested, by motion in the pending action, shall be heard by the presiding chancellor of the district as to the sufficiency of the bond; the chancellor hearing the motion may thereupon fix the bond.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.109.
Inventory.

Within thirty (30) days after the filing of the notice of the taking possession of a state trust company in the office of the chancery clerk, the commissioner, or a duly appointed agent, shall file an inventory of the assets and liabilities of such state trust company. A copy of the inventory shall be filed with the chancery clerk in the pending action and a copy shall be kept on file in the state trust company. The inventory shall be open for inspection during the usual business hours, provided that nothing herein shall require the state trust company to remain open unnecessarily.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.110.
Notice and time for filing claims.

Notice shall be given by advertisement once a week for four (4) consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in the county where the state trust company is located, or if no newspaper is published in the county, then in some newspaper having a general circulation in the county, calling on all persons who may have claims against the state trust company to present the same to the commissioner at the office of the state trust company, and within the time to be specified in the notice which time shall not be less than ninety (90) days from the date of the first publication. A copy of this notice shall be mailed to all persons whose names appear as creditors upon the books of the state trust company. Affidavit by the commissioner, or agent mailing the notice, to the effect that the notice was mailed shall be conclusive evidence thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.111.
Power to reject claims; notice; affidavit of service; action on claims.

If the commissioner, or a duly appointed agent, doubts the validity of any claim, the commissioner or agent may reject the same and serve notice of such rejection upon the claimant, either personally or by registered mail, and an affidavit of the service of such notice shall be filed in the office of the chancery clerk in the pending action, and shall be conclusive evidence of such notice. Any action or suit upon rejected claim must be brought by the claimant against the commissioner or agent, in the chancery court of the county in which the state trust company is located within ninety (90) days after such service, or the same shall be barred. Objections to any claim not rejected by the commissioner, or the duly appointed agent, may be made by any person interested by filing such objection in the pending action and by serving a copy thereof on the commissioner, or duly appointed agent, and the commissioner, or duly appointed agent, after investigation, shall either allow such objection and reject the claim, or disallow the objection. If the objection is not allowed and the claim not rejected, the commissioner, or the duly appointed agent, shall file a notice to this effect in the pending action; and within ten (10) days thereafter, the person filing objection by motion in the pending action, a copy of which notice shall be served upon the person whose claim or deposit is objected to, and present to the court the question of the validity of the claim; and the questions of law and issues of fact shall thereupon be determined as in other civil actions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.112.
List of claims presented and deposits; copies; proviso.

Upon the expiration of the time fixed for presentation of claims, the commissioner, or the duly appointed agent, shall make a full and complete list of the claims presented, including and specifying any claims which have been rejected. One (1) copy shall be filed in the office of the chancery clerk in the pending action, and one (1) copy shall be kept on file with the inventory in the office of the state trust company for examination. Any claim which may be presented after the expiration of the time fixed for the presentation of claims in the notice hereinbefore provided shall, if allowed, share pro rata in the distribution only of those assets of the state trust company in the hands of the commissioner, and undistributed at the time the claim is presented. However, when it is made to appear to the presiding chancellor in the district, that the claim could not have been filed within that period, the chancellor may permit those creditors or depositors who subsequently file their claim to share as other creditors.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.113.
Declaration of dividends; order of preference in distribution.

At any time after the expiration of the date fixed by the commissioner, or the duly appointed agent, for the presentation of claims against the state trust company, and from time-to-time thereafter, the commissioner, out of the funds in the hands of the commissioner, after the payment of expenses and priorities, may declare and pay dividends to the shareholders or participants and other creditors of such state trust company in the order now or hereafter provided by law; and a dividend may be declared when and as often as the funds on hand subject to the payment of dividends shall be sufficient to pay ten percent (10%) of all claims entitled to share in such dividends. In paying dividends and calculating the same, all disputed claims shall be taken into account, but no dividend shall be paid upon such disputed claims until the same shall have been finally determined. The following shall be the order and preference in the distribution of the assets of any state trust company liquidated hereunder:

Taxes and fees due the commissioner for examination or other services;

Wages and salaries due officers and employees of the state trust company, for a period of not more than four (4) months;

Expenses of liquidation;

Amounts due creditors other than stockholders or participants.

The word “asset” used herein shall not be deemed to include bailments or other property to which the state trust company has no title. A statement of all dividends paid shall be filed in the office of the chancery clerk in the pending action, and such statements shall show the expenses deducted and the disputed claims in determining the dividend.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.114.
Deposit of funds collected.

All funds collected by the commissioner, in liquidating any state trust company, shall be deposited from time-to-time in a bank as may be selected by the commissioner, and shall be subject to the check of the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.115.
Employment of counsel; accountants; and other experts; compensation.

The commissioner, for the purpose of liquidating state trust companies as herein provided, shall employ such liquidating agents, competent local attorneys, accountants and clerks as may be necessary to properly liquidate and distribute the assets of a state trust company, and shall fix the compensation for all such agents, attorneys, accountants and clerks, and shall pay the same out of the funds derived from the liquidation of the assets of the state trust company. However, all expenditure for the purpose herein provided shall be approved by the presiding chancellor in the pending action at such time as the same may be reported, and such charges shall be a proper charge and lien on the assets of the state trust company until paid.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.116.
Unclaimed dividends held in trust.

Any unclaimed dividends remaining in the hands of the commissioner for six (6) months after the order for final distributions shall be held in trust for the several creditors of the liquidated state trust company; and the money so held by the commissioner shall be paid over to the persons respectively entitled thereto as and when satisfactory evidence of their right to the same is furnished. In case of doubtful or conflicting claims the commissioner shall have authority to apply to the chancery court, by motion in the pending action, for an order from the chancellor of the district directing the payment of the moneys so claimed. When issues of fact are raised by motion, the same may, upon request of any claimant, be determined as in other civil actions. The interest earned on the unclaimed dividend so held shall be applied toward defraying the expenses incurred in the distribution of such unclaimed dividends. The balance of interest, if any, shall be deposited and held as other funds to the credit of the commissioner. After the commissioner has held the unclaimed dividends held in trust under the provisions of this statute for the creditors of the liquidated state trust company for a period of ten (10) years, the commissioner may pay the principal amount of such unclaimed dividends to the State Treasurer, to be held by the State Treasurer without liability for profit or interest until a just claim therefor shall be made by the parties entitled thereto. Upon payment of unclaimed dividends to the State Treasurer, the commissioner shall be fully discharged from all further liability therefor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.117.
Action by the commissioner following full settlement.

Whenever the commissioner shall have paid all the expenses of liquidation and shall have paid to each and every creditor of such state trust company, whose claims shall have been duly proven and allowed, the full amount of such claims, and shall have made proper provision for unclaimed and unpaid and disputed claims, and shall have in hand other assets of the state trust company, the commissioner shall call a meeting of the shareholders or participants of the state trust company by giving notice thereof by publication once a week for four (4) consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in the county, or if no newspaper is published in the county, then in a newspaper having general circulation in the county, and by mailing a copy of such notice to each shareholder’s or participant’s address as the same shall appear upon the books of the state trust company. Affidavit of the mailing of the notice herein required and of the printer as to the publication shall be conclusive evidence of notice hereunder. At such meeting any shareholders or participants may be represented by proxy and the shareholders or participants shall elect, by a majority vote of the stock present, an agent or agents who shall be authorized to receive from the commissioner all the assets of the state trust company then remaining in the commissioner’s hands; and the commissioner shall cause to be transferred and delivered to the agent, or agents, all such assets of the state trust company. The commissioner shall thereupon cause to be filed in the office of the chancery clerk in the pending actions a full and complete report of all his transactions, showing the assets of the state trust company so transferred, together with the name of the agent or agents receipting for the same; and the filing of such report shall act as a full and complete discharge of the commissioner from all further liabilities by reason of the liquidation of the state trust company. Such agent, or agents, shall convert the assets coming into his or her hands, or their hands, into cash, and shall make distribution to the shareholders or participants of the state trust company as herein provided. The agent, or agents, shall file semiannually a report of all transactions with the chancery court of the county in which the state trust company is located, and with the commissioner, and shall be allowed for such services such fees not in excess of five percent (5%), as may be fixed by the court. In case of death, removal or refusal to act, of any agent or agents elected by the shareholders or participants, the commissioner shall, upon report of such action on the part of such agent or agents to the chancery court of the county in which the state trust company is located, turn over to the chancery court for the stockholders of the state trust company, all the remaining assets of the state trust company, file the required report and be discharged from any and all further liability to the shareholders or participants as herein provided. The assets, when turned over to the chancery court hereunder, shall remain in the hands of the court until such time as, by court order or by action of the shareholders or participants, distribution shall be provided for.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.118.
Annual report of the commissioner; items included.

The commissioner shall file, as a part of an annual report to the Governor, a list of the names of the state trust companies of which possession was taken and liquidated; and the commissioner shall, from time-to-time compile and make available for public inspection, reports showing the condition of each and all such state trust companies; and the annual report of the commissioner shall show the sum of unclaimed assets, with respect to each state trust company, and shall show all depositories of all sums coming into the hands of the commissioner under the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.119.
Compensation of the commissioner.

The commissioner, for services rendered in connection with the liquidation of state trust companies hereunder, shall be entitled to actual expenses incurred in connection with the liquidation of each state trust company, including therein a reasonable sum for the time of the examiners and other agents of the commissioner, which expenses shall be a prior lien on the assets of such state trust company so liquidated until paid in full; and the commissioner shall have authority to prescribe reasonable rules and regulations for fixing such expenses.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.120.
Exclusive method of liquidation.

No state trust company created before July 1, 1998, shall be liquidated in any other way or manner than that provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.121.
Disposition of books and records.

All books, papers and records of a state trust company which has been finally liquidated shall be deposited by the receiver in the office of the chancery clerk for the county in which the office of such state trust company is located, or in such other place as in the receiver’s judgment will provide for the proper safekeeping and protection of such books, papers, and records. The books, papers, and records herein referred to shall be held subject to the orders of the commissioner and the chancery clerk of the county in which such state trust company was located.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.122.
Destruction of books and records.

After the expiration of five (5) years from the date of filing in the office of the chancery clerk of a final order approving the liquidation by the commissioner of any insolvent state trust company and the delivery to the clerk or into the clerk’s custody of the records of such state trust company, the same may be destroyed by the chancery clerk.

After five (5) years from the filing by the commissioner of a final report of liquidation of any insolvent state trust company, the commissioner may destroy the records of any insolvent state trust company held in the office of the commissioner in connection with the liquidation of such state trust company. However, in connection with any unpaid dividends the commissioner shall preserve the records or other evidence of indebtedness of the trust company with reference to the unpaid dividend until the dividend shall have been paid.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.123.
Trust terminated on insolvency of state trust company.

Whenever any state trust company created under the laws of this state, which has heretofore been, or shall hereafter be, appointed trustee in any indenture, deed of trust or other instrument of like character, executed to secure the payment of any bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness, has been or shall be by reason of insolvency, or for any other cause provided by law, taken over for liquidation by the commissioner or by any other legally reconstituted authority, the powers and duties of such state trust company as trustee in any such instrument shall, upon the entry of an order of the chancery clerk of the court appointing a successor trustee, upon a petition as hereinafter provided, immediately cease and terminate.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.124.
Petition for new trustee.

In all cases of insolvency and liquidation provided in this article, the chancery clerk of any county in which such indenture, deed of trust or other instrument of like character is recorded, shall, upon the verified petition of any person interested in any such trust, either as trustee, beneficiary or otherwise, which interest shall be set out in the petition, enter an order directing service on all interested parties either personally or by the publication in some newspaper published in the county, or in some adjoining county if no newspaper is published in the county where such application is made, a notice directed to all persons concerned, commanding and requiring all persons having any interest in the trust, appear in the clerk’s office at a day designated in the order and notice, not less than thirty (30) days from the date thereof, and show cause why a new trustee shall not be appointed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.125.
Publication and notice.

Such notice shall be published in the manner required by law for service of summons by publication, and shall set forth the names of the parties to the indenture deed of trust, or other such instrument, the date thereof, and the place or places where the same is recorded.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.126.
Appointment where no objection made.

If, upon the day fixed in the notice, no person appears and objects to the appointment of a substitute trustee, the clerk shall, upon such terms the clerk deems advisable and in the best interest of all parties, appoint some competent person, or corporation authorized to act as, substitute trustee. The substitute trustee shall be vested with and shall exercise all the powers reconferred upon the trustee named in this instrument.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.127.
Hearing upon objection.

If objections are made to the appointment of a new trustee, the clerk shall hear and determine the matter, and from the clerk’s decision an appeal may be prosecuted as in the case of special proceedings generally.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.128.
Registration of final order.

The final order of appointment of a new trustee shall be certified by the clerk in an order which shall be recorded in the office of the register of deeds in the county or counties in which the instrument under which the appointment has been made was recorded, and a notation of the same shall be entered by the register of deeds on the margin of the record where the original instrument was recorded.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.129.
Petition and order applicable to all instruments.

The petition and the order appointing a new trustee may include, relate and apply to any number of indentures, deeds of trust or other instruments, wherein the same trustee is named.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.130.
Additional remedy.

Sections 81-27-8.124 and 81-27-8.129 shall be in addition to and not in substitution for any other remedy provided by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-8.131.
Report to the Secretary of State.

The commissioner shall on or before the first day of each year thereafter file with the Secretary of State a report showing all state trust companies under liquidation in this state, and the names of any and all auditors together with the amounts paid to them for auditing each of the state trust companies, and the names of any and all attorneys employed in connection with the liquidation of the state trust companies together with the amount paid or contracted to be paid to each of the attorneys. If any attorney has been employed on a fee contingent upon recovery, the report must state in substance the contract.

Within five (5) days from the receipt of the report the Secretary of State shall cause the same to be published one (1) time in some newspaper published in each county in which a state trust company or state trust companies are under liquidation. If there is no newspaper published in the county, the Secretary of State shall cause a copy of the report to be posted at the courthouse door in the county.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.